Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 2. Highway Contractors’ Association.

§ 33.2-1106.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

“Highway contractors’ association”
means any association, bureau, agency, or other medium, incorporated or unincorporated, whose object or work is to promote the common welfare of, furnish information to, promote cooperation among, stimulate the demand for the services of, or advertise the members thereof.

“Member of highway contractors’ association”
means any individual partnership, or corporation engaged in contracting for the construction, repair, and maintenance of highways and highway bridges and for supplying labor, material, machinery, and supplies for use in highways and bridges that is a member of, stockholder in, subscriber of, or contributor to, or that is in any way affiliated with, any highway contractors’ association.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-270, 33-271; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-336, 33.1-337; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1107.
Statements to be furnished.

Every highway contractors’ association domiciled in the Commonwealth shall, upon request from the Secretary of the Commonwealth, within 30 days of such request, but no more often than once a calendar year, furnish in writing to the Secretary of the Commonwealth the following information:

The names and post office addresses of all of its members. When any member is a firm, the names and addresses of the members of the firm shall be furnished. When any member is a corporation, the names of the officers of the corporation shall be furnished.

The names and post office addresses of the officers of the highway contractors’ association and the duties and salaries of the officers.

The property and income of the highway contractors’ association and by whom the same is paid.

An itemized statement of the expenditures of such association.

A copy of the charter and bylaws, if incorporated, and a copy of the constitution and bylaws, if unincorporated, of such association.Such statements shall become public records.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-272; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-338; 1977, c. 206; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1108.
Papers, accounts, and records open to examination by certain officers.

All papers, accounts, and records of every nature of every highway contractors’ association, a member of which submits a bid for any construction, maintenance, or repair of any public highway or bridge or for the supplying of labor, material, or supplies for any such construction, repair, or maintenance, whether such highway association is domiciled in Virginia or is a foreign highway contractors’ association doing business in Virginia, shall be at all times during business hours open to examination and inspection by the Governor, the Attorney General, the Comptroller, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Board and any member thereof, and the duly authorized agent or representative of any of such officers or of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-273; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-339; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1109.
Effect of refusal to permit or withholding from examination of papers, etc.

If any highway contractors’ association, whether domiciled in Virginia or not, on application of any person authorized by this article to examine and inspect its records, refuses to permit such examination and inspection of its papers, accounts, and records, or fails to produce at its principal office for examination and inspection any of its papers, accounts, or records when requested so to do, or knowingly withholds from examination and inspection any of its papers, accounts, and records, for the purpose of secreting any of its acts or activities or the amount or sources of or the use made of its revenue, the person requesting or making such examination and inspection shall report the fact to the Governor, who shall certify the fact to the Commissioner of Highways.

No contract for highway or highway bridge construction, repair, or maintenance or for the supplying of any labor, materials, or supplies for such construction, repair, or maintenance shall be thereafter let to any member of such association until the Governor has certified to the Board that a full examination and inspection of the papers, accounts, and records of such association has been made with the free consent and cooperation of such association and that such examination and inspection discloses nothing in the purposes, methods, or activities of such association detrimental to the public interest or tending to prevent competition in or increase the cost of highway and highway bridge construction, repair, or maintenance in the Commonwealth and that none of its revenue has been used for political purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-274; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-340; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1110.
Effect of using certain methods or engaging in certain activities.

If upon any such inspection or examination as is provided for in this article it is found that any highway contractors’ association of which any individual, partnership, or corporation holding a contract for the construction, maintenance, or repair of any public highway or bridge or for supplying any labor, materials, or supplies for any such construction, repair, or maintenance is a member has made use of methods or engaged in activities tending to prevent competition in the bidding on such contract or to increase the cost of such contract to the Commonwealth or county or has brought to bear or endeavored to bring to bear political influence to secure for such member such contract, then the Board may, at its option, cancel and annul such contract, paying thereon for the work done or labor, material, and supplies furnished only the reasonable value of the work done or labor, material, and supplies furnished.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-275; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-341; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1111.
Certificate to be filed with bid for highway or bridge construction, etc.

Every individual, partnership, or corporation bidding upon any proposed contract for the construction, repair, or maintenance of any part of any public highway or bridge and for supplying any labor, material, or supplies to be used in any such construction, repair, or maintenance shall file with such bid a sworn statement giving the name and location of the principal office of every highway contractors’ association of which it is or has been a member during the preceding 12 months. No bid not accompanied by such certificate shall be considered by the Board or the Commissioner of Highways in letting any contract bid upon, nor shall any such contract be let by the Board or the Commissioner of Highways to any bidder failing to file the certificate required by this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-276; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-342; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1112.
Affidavit to be filed with bid upon work.

Every member of any highway contractors’ association who bids upon any work let by the Board or the Commissioner of Highways shall file with his bid an affidavit in substance as follows: that the bidder neither directly nor indirectly has entered into any combination or arrangement with any person, firm, or corporation or entered into any agreement the effect of which is to prevent competition or increase the cost of construction or maintenance of highways or bridges.

The Board or the Commissioner or Highways shall prescribe the form of this affidavit and no bid shall be accepted unless accompanied by such affidavit.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-277; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-343; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805.